Utah statutes.
41-6a-1708.   Driving in canyons and on mountain highways.
The operator of a motor vehicle traveling through defiles or canyons or on
mountain highways shall:
(1)  hold the motor vehicle under control and as near the right-hand edge of
the roadway as reasonably possible; and
(2)  except when driving entirely on the right of the center of the roadway,
give an audible warning with the horn of the motor vehicle upon approaching
any curve where the view is obstructed within a distance of 200 feet along the
highway.
